Utah statutes.
53A-24-103.   Creation -- Responsibilities.

(1)  There is created the Utah State Office of Rehabilitation under the policy direction of the State Board of Education and under the direction and general supervision of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)  The board is the sole state agency designated to administer the state plans for vocational rehabilitation and independent living rehabilitation programs.

(3)  The office is the state unit designated to carry out the state plans and other duties assigned by law or the board.

